Utah statutes.
58-53-401.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.

Grounds for refusing to issue a license to an applicant, for refusing to renew the license of a licensee, for revoking, suspending, restricting, or placing on probation the license of a licensee, for issuing a public or private reprimand to a licensee, and for issuing cease and desist orders shall be in accordance with Section 58-1-401.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 191, 1998 General Session

